District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.03d

General Business License and General Contractor/Construction Manager License.

(a)

A General Business License shall be required for all businesses engaging in any business transaction in the District that have a business tax identification number and who are not otherwise required to obtain an endorsement under a license endorsement category under this chapter. If a business entity is comprised of principals who are required to maintain licenses granted or regulated by a local, state, or national certification board or body, the entity and its licensed principals shall not be required to obtain a General Business License. A biennial fee of $200 shall be charged for the General Business License.

(b)

A General Contractor/Construction Manager License shall be required for individuals or businesses engaged in general contracting or construction management. A biennial fee of $500 shall be charged for the license. The Mayor may establish, by rule, bond requirements for general contractors and construction managers as a condition for issuance of the General Contractor/Construction Manager License.

(c)

The Mayor may adjust, by rule, the license fees established in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

(d)

A license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a General Business endorsement to a basic business license.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 2007(b), 55 DCR 7598

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2851.13.

Short Title

Short title: Section 2006 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle C of title II of the act may be cited as the “Business Licensing Processing Adjustment Act of 2008”.